Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1338
Cooperative farm land company; fees; disposition.

Annual fees collected under section 21-1336 shall be reported by the Secretary of State to the Tax Commissioner, and shall be paid by the secretary into the state treasury and credited to the General Fund.

Laws 1941, c. 38, § 6, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 24-2106;

R.S.1943, § 21-1338.